District of Columbia statutes.
42-3131.13

Public identification of owner.

The Mayor may cause to be affixed to the property containing a vacant building required to be registered under this chapter a sign setting forth the name of the owner of each unit and any other pertinent information that the Mayor may require to protect the public health and welfare.

History

Apr. 14, 1906, 34 Stat. 115, ch. 1626, § 13
as added Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 101, 48 DCR 1888